Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 6. Member’s Dissociation

§ 4081.
Events causing member’s dissociation.

A person is dissociated from a limited liability company upon the occurrence of any of the following events:

the company’s having notice of the member’s express will to withdraw upon the date of notice or, if a later withdrawal date is specified by the member, on the later date;

an event agreed to in the operating agreement as causing the member’s dissociation;

the member’s expulsion pursuant to the operating agreement;

the member’s expulsion by unanimous vote of the other members if:

it is unlawful to carry on the company’s business with the person as a member;

there has been a transfer of substantially all of the member’s distributional interest, other than a transfer for security purposes, or a court order charging the member’s distributional interest, which has not been foreclosed;

a corporation that is a member fails to obtain a revocation of its certificate of dissolution or a reinstatement of its charter or its right to conduct business within 90 days after the company notifies such member that it will be expelled because it has filed a certificate of dissolution or the equivalent, its charter has been revoked, or its right to conduct business has been suspended by the jurisdiction of its incorporation; or

a partnership or a limited liability company that is a member has been dissolved and its business is being wound up;

on application by the company or another member, the member’s expulsion by judicial determination because the member:

engaged in wrongful conduct that has adversely and materially affected, or will adversely and materially affect, the company’s business;

willfully or persistently committed a material breach of the operating agreement or of a duty owed to the company or the other members under section 4059 of this title; or

engaged in conduct relating to the company’s business which makes it not reasonably practicable to carry on the business with the person as a member;

in a member-managed limited liability company, the member:

becomes a debtor in bankruptcy;

executes an assignment for the benefit of creditors;

seeks, consents to, or acquiesces in, the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the member or of all or substantially all of the member’s property; or

fails, within 90 days after the appointment, to have vacated or stayed the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the member or of all or substantially all of the member’s property obtained without the member’s consent or acquiescence, or fails within 90 days after the expiration of a stay to have the appointment vacated;

in the case of a member who is an individual:

the member’s death; or

in a member-managed limited liability company:

the appointment of a guardian or general conservator for the member; or

a judicial determination that the member has otherwise become incapable of performing the member’s duties under the operating agreement;

in the case of a member that is a trust or is acting as a member by virtue of being a trustee of a trust, distribution of the trust’s entire rights to receive distributions from the company, but not merely by reason of the substitution of a successor trustee;

in the case of a member that is an estate or is acting as a member by virtue of being a personal representative of an estate, distribution of the estate’s entire distributional interest in the company, but not merely the substitution of a successor personal representative;

termination of the existence of a member if the member is not an individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, estate, or trust;

the company participates in a merger under subchapter 10 of this chapter and:

the company is not the surviving entity; or

the person otherwise ceases to be a member as a result of the merger;

the company participates in a conversion under subchapter 10 of this chapter;

the company participates in a domestication under subchapter 10 of this chapter, and, the person ceases to be a member as a result of the domestication; or

termination of a member’s continued membership in a limited liability company for any other reason.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4082.
Member’s power to dissociate; wrongful dissociation.

A person has the power to dissociate as a member from a limited liability company at any time, rightfully or wrongfully, by express will pursuant to subdivision 4081(1) of this title.

A member’s dissociation from a limited liability company is wrongful only if the dissociation:

is in breach of an express provision of the operating agreement or articles of organization; or

occurs before the termination of the company and:

the member withdraws as a member by express will;

the member is expelled as a member by judicial determination under subdivision 4081(5) of this title;

the member is dissociated under subdivision 4081(6)(A) of this title by becoming a debtor in bankruptcy; or

in the case of a member who is not an individual, trust other than a business trust, or estate, the member is expelled or otherwise dissociated because it willfully dissolved or terminated its existence.

A person that wrongfully dissociates as a member from a limited liability company is liable to the company and, subject to section 4131 of this title, to the other members for damages caused by the dissociation.
(c) (1) A person that wrongfully dissociates as a member from a limited liability company is liable to the company and, subject to section 4131 of this title, to the other members for damages caused by the dissociation.

The liability is in addition to any other debt, obligation, or other liability of the member to the company or to the other members.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4083.
Effect of member’s dissociation.

When a person is dissociated as a member of a limited liability company:

the person’s right to participate as a member in the management and conduct of the company’s business terminates;

if the company is member-managed, the person’s fiduciary duties as a member end with regard to matters arising and events occurring after the person’s dissociation; and

subject to section 4075 of this title and subchapter 10 of this chapter, any distributional interest owned by the person immediately before dissociation in the person’s capacity as a member is owned by the person solely as a transferee.

A person’s dissociation as a member of a limited liability company does not of itself discharge the person from any debt, obligation, or other liability to the company or the other members that the person incurred while a member.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.